Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 12 District Court Practice

9-12-1, 9-12-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 266, 267; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 25, effective January 10, 1966.

9-12-3.
Special complaint where whole amount exceeds court jurisdiction.

In all actions in the district court where the whole amount is more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and the balance stated by the plaintiff does not exceed that sum, he or she may bring his or her action for such balance, and shall so state specially in his or her complaint, and he or she shall, on the filing of the complaint, or afterwards on motion, file his or her account of debt and credit in the action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 275; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, § 10; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-12-3

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 24; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 9.

9-12-4.
Action on instrument originally exceeding jurisdictional amount.

In all actions for the recovery of money due on any note or other instrument in writing, which was given originally for five thousand dollars ($5,000) or a larger sum, and which by indorsement or by acknowledgment is reduced to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or under, including principal and interest, suit may be brought before the district court as provided in §

9-12-3

, and judgment may be entered thereon, and execution awarded, in the same manner as though the note or other instrument in writing had been originally given for the sum to which the note or other instrument in writing has been reduced.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 276; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, § 11; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-12-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 9; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 80.

9-12-5 — 9-12-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 268 — 271; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, §§ 3 — 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 12; P.L. 1920, ch. 1935, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, §§ 3 — 6, 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, §§ 3 — 6, 12; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 25, effective January 10, 1966.

9-12-10.
Claim of appeal of superior court.

Except as otherwise provided, in all civil cases in the district court, any party may cause the case to be removed for trial on all questions of law and fact to the superior court for the county in which division the suit is pending by claiming an appeal from the judgment of the district court, in writing, filed with the clerk of the division within two (2) days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after the judgment is entered; provided, that the party claiming the appeal, at the time of claiming the appeal, shall pay to the clerk all costs, including an attorney’s fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), for the party or parties adversely interested in the judgment, to be paid by the clerk to the attorney for the adverse party. The attorney’s fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be divided equally among the attorneys for the parties adversely interested when more than one adverse party is involved; and provided, further, that costs shall not be taxed, exclusive of the attorney’s fee, at a sum not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), in addition to a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 272; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, § 7; P.L. 1929, ch. 1326, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-12-10

; P.L. 1956, ch. 3751, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 24; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 9; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 3; P.L. 1977, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 3.

9-12-10.1.
Claim of appeal to superior court in landlord tenant actions.

In any civil action pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34, in the district court or other appropriate court, any party may cause the case to be removed for trial on all questions of law and fact to the superior court for the county in which division the suit is pending, by claiming an appeal from the judgment of the district or other appropriate court, in writing, filed with the clerk of the division within five (5) days after the judgment is entered; provided, that the party claiming the appeal at the time of claiming the appeal, shall pay to the clerk all costs, including an attorney’s fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the party or parties adversely interested in the judgment, to be paid by the clerk to the attorney for the adverse party; provided, further, that costs shall not be taxed, exclusive of the attorney’s fee, at a sum less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), in addition to a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 80; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 3.

9-12-11.
Transmission of papers to superior court — Assignment for trial.

If an appeal is claimed, the case and the papers shall, on the next court day of the district court, be certified and forthwith transmitted to the superior court for the county wherein the division is situated, and the case shall be in order for assignment for trial in accordance with applicable procedural rules after ten (10) days from the certification, but if the case is for tenement let, or held at will or by sufferance, and including leases of land, it shall at once be certified to the superior court, and shall be in order for assignment forthwith, and shall take precedence of other matters on the calendar.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 273; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, § 8; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-12-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 24; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 9; P.L. 1986, ch. 157, § 1.

9-12-12.
Appeal bond of defendant in action for possession of commercial or other tenements let.

Every defendant in an action for the possession of commercial or other tenements let or held at will or sufferance, other than actions pursuant to chapter 18 of title 34, claiming an appeal shall, in addition to making the payments required by §

9-12-10

, give bond to the plaintiff, with one or more sureties satisfactory to the district court, to pay all rent or other money due, or which may become due pending the action under the tenancy, and such damages and costs as may be awarded against him or her, the bond to be filed with the clerk of the district court, or person acting as clerk, at the time of claiming an appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 285, § 2.

9-12-13.
Costs in superior court.

Where an appeal is claimed by the plaintiff under the provisions of §

9-12-10

, and the judgment in the superior court, if for the plaintiff, does not exceed the amount awarded him or her in the district court, he or she shall recover no costs, and shall also pay the defendant’s costs, and if on the plaintiff’s claim of appeal the judgment, as in the district court, shall be for the defendant, the defendant shall be entitled to double costs; and if the defendant claims an appeal and the judgment is for the plaintiff for the same or a greater amount than that awarded by the district court, the defendant shall be taxed double costs. In cases involving multiple plaintiffs or multiple defendants, costs, including double costs, shall be taxed in the discretion of the court, and the costs may be taxed against a coparty as well as against the opposing party or parties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 272; G.L. 1909, ch. 286, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 336, § 7; P.L. 1929, ch. 1326, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 525, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-12-13

; P.L. 1956, ch. 3751, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 24.